Tennessee, session 114, SB0354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-4-114(a)(1), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subdivision:
Reports filed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1) may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0354
001928
- 1 -